apertium-ote.ote.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Hñähñu

PATTERNS

Verbs
Nouns
Determiners
Prepositions
Pronouns
Conjunctions
Adverbs
Adjectives
Propernouns
Punctuation
Numerals
Numbers
Interjections

PATTERN Verbs

Proclitic # proclitics on their own
(Proclitic [+:\ ])? Verb-Stem Objects? Verb-Pl?
(Proclitic [+:>])? Verb-Stem Objects? Verb-Pl?		# Dir/LR  ! Source/train

PATTERN Proclitic

[<neg>:hin]? Proclitics(1) [<aux>:] Proclitics(2):

PATTERN Verb-Stem

Verb-Stems(1) [<v>:] Verb-Stems(2):

LEXICON Verb-Pl

<s_pl>:>hu̱
<s_pl>:>{⌥}hu̱    # Dir/LR


PATTERN Nouns

Noun-Stems [<n>:] Noun-Poss? [<pl>:hu̱]?

PATTERN Adverbs

Adv-Stems [<adv>:]

PATTERN Adjectives

Adj-Stems [<adj>:]

PATTERN Determiners

Determiner-Stems(1) [<det>:] Determiner-Stems(2):

PATTERN Pronouns

Pron-Stems(1) [<prn>:] Pron-Stems(2):

PATTERN Conjunctions

Conj-Stems(1) Conj-Stems(2):

PATTERN Prepositions

Prep-Stems [<pr>:]

PATTERN Propernouns

NP-Stems(1) [<np>:] NP-Stems(2):




LEXICON Verb-Stems(2)

pädi:pädi					<tv>	# saber
po̱tsʼe:po̱tsʼe				<iv>	# subir
peni:{ʼ}{P}eni				<tv>	# lavar
fu̱di:fu̱di					<iv>	# empezar
tehmi:tehmi					<tv>	# quebrar
tehmi:{ъ}tehmi				<iv>	# quebrarse
ʼbai:ʼbai					<iv>	# pararse
tai:t{h}ai					<tv>	# comprar
thädi:thädi					<tv>	# contestar
tsa:tsa						<tv>	# mordar
tsa:tsá						<tv>	# mordar ! Source/train
ku̱ni:ku̱ni					<tv>	# molir
ju̱ki:ju̱ki					<tv>	# sacar
juadi:juadi					<tv>	# terminar
o̱de:{ʼ}{y}o̱de				<tv>	# oír
ähä:{ʼ}{ñ}ähä				<iv>	# dormir
honi:h{y}oni				<tv>	# buscar
hätsʼi:h{ñ}ätsʼi			<tv>	# llevar
thäʼti:{n}thäʼti			<iv>	# molir
thede:{n}thede				<iv>	# reírse
tsaya:{n}tsaya				<iv>	# descansar
xo̱ni:{n}xo̱ni				<iv>	# apresurarse
sagi:{n}sagi				<iv>	# brincar
tsa:{🪅}{n}tsa				<tv>	# comer
tse̱käza:{🪅}{n}tse̱käza	<tv>	# cortar
pahai:{🪅}{m}pahai			<tv>	# vender
tsithe:{🪅}{n}tsithe		<tv>	# tomar
täte:{🪅}{n}täte			<iv>	# vencer ! FIXME: technically tä<v><tv>+te
xofo:xofo					<tv>	# cosechar
äni:{ʼ}{n}äni				<tv>	# menear
huahni:huahni				<tv>	# escoger
ʼue̱ti:ʼue̱ti					<tv>	# coser
embi:{ʼ}{ñ}embi			<tv>	# decir
ehe:{ʼ}{ñ}ehe				<iv>	# venir  
ʼbu̱i:ʼbu̱i					<iv>	# haber; vivir; radicar; estar

# FIXME: verbs below this line haven't been checked
#        for morphophonological alternations
su:su							<tv>	# cuidar ! FIXME: check <tv>
ho:ho							<tv>	# matar
tsani:tsani					<tv>	# maldecir
tso̱ni:tso̱ni					<tv>	# visitar
u̱ni:u̱ni						<tv>	# lastimar
te̱ni:te̱ni					<tv>	# seguir
e̱ni:{ʼ}e̱ni					<iv>	# echar fuera
enä:enä						<tv>	# decir
tsogi:tsogi					<tv>	# dejar
tu:tu							<tv>	# deber
tsi:tsi						<tv>	# comer
pe:pe							<tv>	# robar
ʼra:ʼra						<tv>	# dar
ʼra:rʼa						<tv>	# dar  ! Dir/LR
pa:pa							<tv>	# vender
tähä:tähä					<tv>	# ganar
mihi:mihi					<tv>	# pedir prestado; agarrar
toca:toca					<tv>	# tocar
pa:pa							<tv>	# vender
epi:epi						<tv>	# convenir
xipi:xipi					<tv>	# decir
ne:ne							<tv>	# querer, desear; apetecer
nuni:nuni					<iv>	# encogerse
ʼbe̱pi:ʼbe̱pi					<tv>	# faltar (a alguien); ordenar, mandar; incitar, instigar
# FIXME: bʼe̱ki - me falta; bʼe̱ʼi - te falta
mä:{h}mä						<tv>	# decir
ko̱nti:ko̱nti					<tv>	# negar
tsunti:tsunti				<tv>	# prohibir
bʼe̱nga:bʼe̱nga				<iv>	# replegarse
ge:ge							<iv>	# ser; grunir
ñá:ñá							<iv>	# hablar
te:te							<iv>	# vivir; crecer

# AUTOMATICALLY ADDED:
